Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-214
Village overseer of streets; power and duties.

The village overseer of streets shall, subject to the order of the village board of trustees, have general charge, direction, and control of all works on streets, sidewalks, culverts, and bridges of the village and shall perform such other duties as the village board of trustees may direct.

Laws 1885, c. 18, § 1, p. 160;

R.S.1913, § 5064;

C.S.1922, § 4236;

C.S.1929, § 17-214;

R.S.1943, § 17-214;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 78.